Illinois, session 104th, HB3020.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 370c as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/370c)  (from Ch. 73, par. 982c)7    Sec. 370c. Mental and emotional disorders. 8    (a)(1) On and after January 1, 2022 (the effective date of 9Public Act 102-579), every insurer that amends, delivers, 10issues, or renews group accident and health policies providing 11coverage for hospital or medical treatment or services for 12illness on an expense-incurred basis shall provide coverage 13for the medically necessary treatment of mental, emotional, 14nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions consistent 15with the parity requirements of Section 370c.1 of this Code.16    (2) Each insured that is covered for mental, emotional, 17nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions shall be 18free to select the physician licensed to practice medicine in 19all its branches, licensed clinical psychologist, licensed 20clinical social worker, licensed clinical professional 21counselor, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed 22speech-language pathologist, or other licensed or certified 23professional at a program licensed pursuant to the Substance   HB3020- 2 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1Use Disorder Act of his or her choice to treat such disorders, 2and the insurer shall pay the covered charges of such 3physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches, 4licensed clinical psychologist, licensed clinical social 5worker, licensed clinical professional counselor, licensed 6marriage and family therapist, licensed speech-language 7pathologist, or other licensed or certified professional at a 8program licensed pursuant to the Substance Use Disorder Act up 9to the limits of coverage, provided (i) the disorder or 10condition treated is covered by the policy, and (ii) the 11physician, licensed psychologist, licensed clinical social 12worker, licensed clinical professional counselor, licensed 13marriage and family therapist, licensed speech-language 14pathologist, or other licensed or certified professional at a 15program licensed pursuant to the Substance Use Disorder Act is 16authorized to provide said services under the statutes of this 17State and in accordance with accepted principles of his or her 18profession.19    (3) Insofar as this Section applies solely to licensed 20clinical social workers, licensed clinical professional 21counselors, licensed marriage and family therapists, licensed 22speech-language pathologists, and other licensed or certified 23professionals at programs licensed pursuant to the Substance 24Use Disorder Act, those persons who may provide services to 25individuals shall do so after the licensed clinical social 26worker, licensed clinical professional counselor, licensed   HB3020- 3 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1marriage and family therapist, licensed speech-language 2pathologist, or other licensed or certified professional at a 3program licensed pursuant to the Substance Use Disorder Act 4has informed the patient of the desirability of the patient 5conferring with the patient's primary care physician.6    (4) "Mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorder 7or condition" means a condition or disorder that involves a 8mental health condition or substance use disorder that falls 9under any of the diagnostic categories listed in the mental 10and behavioral disorders chapter of the current edition of the 11World Health Organization's International Classification of 12Disease or that is listed in the most recent version of the 13American Psychiatric Association's Diagnostic and Statistical 14Manual of Mental Disorders. "Mental, emotional, nervous, or 15substance use disorder or condition" includes any mental 16health condition that occurs during pregnancy or during the 17postpartum period and includes, but is not limited to, 18postpartum depression.19    (5) Medically necessary treatment and medical necessity 20determinations shall be interpreted and made in a manner that 21is consistent with and pursuant to subsections (h) through 22(t). 23    (b)(1) (Blank).24    (2) (Blank).25    (2.5) (Blank). 26    (3) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law and   HB3020- 4 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1consistent with the parity requirements of Section 370c.1 of 2this Code, the reimbursing insurer that amends, delivers, 3issues, or renews a group or individual policy of accident and 4health insurance, a qualified health plan offered through the 5health insurance marketplace, or a provider of treatment of 6mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 7conditions shall furnish medical records or other necessary 8data that substantiate that initial or continued treatment is 9at all times medically necessary. An insurer shall provide a 10mechanism for the timely review by a provider holding the same 11license and practicing in the same specialty as the patient's 12provider, who is unaffiliated with the insurer, jointly 13selected by the patient (or the patient's next of kin or legal 14representative if the patient is unable to act for himself or 15herself), the patient's provider, and the insurer in the event 16of a dispute between the insurer and patient's provider 17regarding the medical necessity of a treatment proposed by a 18patient's provider. If the reviewing provider determines the 19treatment to be medically necessary, the insurer shall provide 20reimbursement for the treatment. Future contractual or 21employment actions by the insurer regarding the patient's 22provider may not be based on the provider's participation in 23this procedure. Nothing prevents the insured from agreeing in 24writing to continue treatment at his or her expense. When 25making a determination of the medical necessity for a 26treatment modality for mental, emotional, nervous, or   HB3020- 5 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1substance use disorders or conditions, an insurer must make 2the determination in a manner that is consistent with the 3manner used to make that determination with respect to other 4diseases or illnesses covered under the policy, including an 5appeals process. Medical necessity determinations for 6substance use disorders shall be made in accordance with 7appropriate patient placement criteria established by the 8American Society of Addiction Medicine. No additional criteria 9may be used to make medical necessity determinations for 10substance use disorders. 11    (4) A group health benefit plan amended, delivered, 12issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2019 (the effective 13date of Public Act 100-1024) or an individual policy of 14accident and health insurance or a qualified health plan 15offered through the health insurance marketplace amended, 16delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2019 (the 17effective date of Public Act 100-1024):18        (A) shall provide coverage based upon medical 19    necessity for the treatment of a mental, emotional, 20    nervous, or substance use disorder or condition consistent 21    with the parity requirements of Section 370c.1 of this 22    Code; provided, however, that in each calendar year 23    coverage shall not be less than the following:24            (i) 45 days of inpatient treatment; and25            (ii) beginning on June 26, 2006 (the effective 26        date of Public Act 94-921), 60 visits for outpatient   HB3020- 6 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1        treatment including group and individual outpatient 2        treatment; and3            (iii) for plans or policies delivered, issued for 4        delivery, renewed, or modified after January 1, 2007 5        (the effective date of Public Act 94-906), 20 6        additional outpatient visits for speech therapy for 7        treatment of pervasive developmental disorders that 8        will be in addition to speech therapy provided 9        pursuant to item (ii) of this subparagraph (A); and10        (B) may not include a lifetime limit on the number of 11    days of inpatient treatment or the number of outpatient 12    visits covered under the plan.13        (C) (Blank).14    (5) An issuer of a group health benefit plan or an 15individual policy of accident and health insurance or a 16qualified health plan offered through the health insurance 17marketplace may not count toward the number of outpatient 18visits required to be covered under this Section an outpatient 19visit for the purpose of medication management and shall cover 20the outpatient visits under the same terms and conditions as 21it covers outpatient visits for the treatment of physical 22illness.23    (5.5) An individual or group health benefit plan amended, 24delivered, issued, or renewed on or after September 9, 2015 25(the effective date of Public Act 99-480) shall offer coverage 26for medically necessary acute treatment services and medically   HB3020- 7 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1necessary clinical stabilization services. The treating 2provider shall base all treatment recommendations and the 3health benefit plan shall base all medical necessity 4determinations for substance use disorders in accordance with 5the most current edition of the Treatment Criteria for 6Addictive, Substance-Related, and Co-Occurring Conditions 7established by the American Society of Addiction Medicine. The 8treating provider shall base all treatment recommendations and 9the health benefit plan shall base all medical necessity 10determinations for medication-assisted treatment in accordance 11with the most current Treatment Criteria for Addictive, 12Substance-Related, and Co-Occurring Conditions established by 13the American Society of Addiction Medicine.14    As used in this subsection:15    "Acute treatment services" means 24-hour medically 16supervised addiction treatment that provides evaluation and 17withdrawal management and may include biopsychosocial 18assessment, individual and group counseling, psychoeducational 19groups, and discharge planning.20    "Clinical stabilization services" means 24-hour treatment, 21usually following acute treatment services for substance 22abuse, which may include intensive education and counseling 23regarding the nature of addiction and its consequences, 24relapse prevention, outreach to families and significant 25others, and aftercare planning for individuals beginning to 26engage in recovery from addiction.   HB3020- 8 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1    (6) An issuer of a group health benefit plan may provide or 2offer coverage required under this Section through a managed 3care plan.4    (6.5) An individual or group health benefit plan amended, 5delivered, issued, or renewed on or after the effective date 6of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly January 71, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 100-1024):8        (A) shall not impose prior authorization requirements, 9    including limitations on dosage, other than those 10    established under the Treatment Criteria for Addictive, 11    Substance-Related, and Co-Occurring Conditions 12    established by the American Society of Addiction Medicine, 13    on a prescription medication approved by the United States 14    Food and Drug Administration that is prescribed or 15    administered for the treatment of substance use disorders;16        (B) shall not impose any step therapy requirements;17        (C) shall place all prescription medications approved 18    by the United States Food and Drug Administration 19    prescribed or administered for the treatment of substance 20    use disorders on, for brand medications, the lowest tier 21    of the drug formulary developed and maintained by the 22    individual or group health benefit plan that covers brand 23    medications and, for generic medications, the lowest tier 24    of the drug formulary developed and maintained by the 25    individual or group health benefit plan that covers 26    generic medications; and  HB3020- 9 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1        (D) shall not exclude coverage for a prescription 2    medication approved by the United States Food and Drug 3    Administration for the treatment of substance use 4    disorders and any associated counseling or wraparound 5    services on the grounds that such medications and services 6    were court ordered; and .7        (E) shall not impose any prior authorization 8    requirements on outpatient services for the prevention, 9    screening, diagnosis, or treatment of mental, emotional, 10    nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions.11    (7) (Blank).12    (8) (Blank).13    (9) With respect to all mental, emotional, nervous, or 14substance use disorders or conditions, coverage for inpatient 15treatment shall include coverage for treatment in a 16residential treatment center certified or licensed by the 17Department of Public Health or the Department of Human 18Services. 19    (c) This Section shall not be interpreted to require 20coverage for speech therapy or other habilitative services for 21those individuals covered under Section 356z.15 of this Code. 22    (d) With respect to a group or individual policy of 23accident and health insurance or a qualified health plan 24offered through the health insurance marketplace, the 25Department and, with respect to medical assistance, the 26Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall each   HB3020- 10 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1enforce the requirements of this Section and Sections 356z.23 2and 370c.1 of this Code, the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici 3Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, 42 4U.S.C. 18031(j), and any amendments to, and federal guidance 5or regulations issued under, those Acts, including, but not 6limited to, final regulations issued under the Paul Wellstone 7and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity 8Act of 2008 and final regulations applying the Paul Wellstone 9and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity 10Act of 2008 to Medicaid managed care organizations, the 11Children's Health Insurance Program, and alternative benefit 12plans. Specifically, the Department and the Department of 13Healthcare and Family Services shall take action:14        (1) proactively ensuring compliance by individual and 15    group policies, including by requiring that insurers 16    submit comparative analyses, as set forth in paragraph (6) 17    of subsection (k) of Section 370c.1, demonstrating how 18    they design and apply nonquantitative treatment 19    limitations, both as written and in operation, for mental, 20    emotional, nervous, or substance use disorder or condition 21    benefits as compared to how they design and apply 22    nonquantitative treatment limitations, as written and in 23    operation, for medical and surgical benefits;24        (2) evaluating all consumer or provider complaints 25    regarding mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 26    disorder or condition coverage for possible parity   HB3020- 11 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1    violations;2        (3) performing parity compliance market conduct 3    examinations or, in the case of the Department of 4    Healthcare and Family Services, parity compliance audits 5    of individual and group plans and policies, including, but 6    not limited to, reviews of:7            (A) nonquantitative treatment limitations, 8        including, but not limited to, prior authorization 9        requirements, concurrent review, retrospective review, 10        step therapy, network admission standards, 11        reimbursement rates, and geographic restrictions;12            (B) denials of authorization, payment, and 13        coverage; and14            (C) other specific criteria as may be determined 15        by the Department.16    The findings and the conclusions of the parity compliance 17market conduct examinations and audits shall be made public.18    The Director may adopt rules to effectuate any provisions 19of the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity 20and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 that relate to the business of 21insurance.22    (e) Availability of plan information. 23        (1) The criteria for medical necessity determinations 24    made under a group health plan, an individual policy of 25    accident and health insurance, or a qualified health plan 26    offered through the health insurance marketplace with   HB3020- 12 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1    respect to mental health or substance use disorder 2    benefits (or health insurance coverage offered in 3    connection with the plan with respect to such benefits) 4    must be made available by the plan administrator (or the 5    health insurance issuer offering such coverage) to any 6    current or potential participant, beneficiary, or 7    contracting provider upon request. 8        (2) The reason for any denial under a group health 9    benefit plan, an individual policy of accident and health 10    insurance, or a qualified health plan offered through the 11    health insurance marketplace (or health insurance coverage 12    offered in connection with such plan or policy) of 13    reimbursement or payment for services with respect to 14    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 15    conditions benefits in the case of any participant or 16    beneficiary must be made available within a reasonable 17    time and in a reasonable manner and in readily 18    understandable language by the plan administrator (or the 19    health insurance issuer offering such coverage) to the 20    participant or beneficiary upon request. 21    (f) As used in this Section, "group policy of accident and 22health insurance" and "group health benefit plan" includes (1) 23State-regulated employer-sponsored group health insurance 24plans written in Illinois or which purport to provide coverage 25for a resident of this State; and (2) State employee health 26plans.   HB3020- 13 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1    (g) (1) As used in this subsection:2    "Benefits", with respect to insurers, means the benefits 3provided for treatment services for inpatient and outpatient 4treatment of substance use disorders or conditions at American 5Society of Addiction Medicine levels of treatment 2.1 6(Intensive Outpatient), 2.5 (Partial Hospitalization), 3.1 7(Clinically Managed Low-Intensity Residential), 3.3 8(Clinically Managed Population-Specific High-Intensity 9Residential), 3.5 (Clinically Managed High-Intensity 10Residential), and 3.7 (Medically Monitored Intensive 11Inpatient) and OMT (Opioid Maintenance Therapy) services.12    "Benefits", with respect to managed care organizations, 13means the benefits provided for treatment services for 14inpatient and outpatient treatment of substance use disorders 15or conditions at American Society of Addiction Medicine levels 16of treatment 2.1 (Intensive Outpatient), 2.5 (Partial 17Hospitalization), 3.5 (Clinically Managed High-Intensity 18Residential), and 3.7 (Medically Monitored Intensive 19Inpatient) and OMT (Opioid Maintenance Therapy) services. 20    "Substance use disorder treatment provider or facility" 21means a licensed physician, licensed psychologist, licensed 22psychiatrist, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, or 23licensed, certified, or otherwise State-approved facility or 24provider of substance use disorder treatment.25    (2) A group health insurance policy, an individual health 26benefit plan, or qualified health plan that is offered through   HB3020- 14 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1the health insurance marketplace, small employer group health 2plan, and large employer group health plan that is amended, 3delivered, issued, executed, or renewed in this State, or 4approved for issuance or renewal in this State, on or after 5January 1, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 100-1023) 6shall comply with the requirements of this Section and Section 7370c.1. The services for the treatment and the ongoing 8assessment of the patient's progress in treatment shall follow 9the requirements of 77 Ill. Adm. Code 2060.10    (3) Prior authorization shall not be utilized for the 11benefits under this subsection. The substance use disorder 12treatment provider or facility shall notify the insurer of the 13initiation of treatment. For an insurer that is not a managed 14care organization, the substance use disorder treatment 15provider or facility notification shall occur for the 16initiation of treatment of the covered person within 2 17business days. For managed care organizations, the substance 18use disorder treatment provider or facility notification shall 19occur in accordance with the protocol set forth in the 20provider agreement for initiation of treatment within 24 21hours. If the managed care organization is not capable of 22accepting the notification in accordance with the contractual 23protocol during the 24-hour period following admission, the 24substance use disorder treatment provider or facility shall 25have one additional business day to provide the notification 26to the appropriate managed care organization. Treatment plans   HB3020- 15 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1shall be developed in accordance with the requirements and 2timeframes established in 77 Ill. Adm. Code 2060. If the 3substance use disorder treatment provider or facility fails to 4notify the insurer of the initiation of treatment in 5accordance with these provisions, the insurer may follow its 6normal prior authorization processes.7    (4) For an insurer that is not a managed care 8organization, if an insurer determines that benefits are no 9longer medically necessary, the insurer shall notify the 10covered person, the covered person's authorized 11representative, if any, and the covered person's health care 12provider in writing of the covered person's right to request 13an external review pursuant to the Health Carrier External 14Review Act. The notification shall occur within 24 hours 15following the adverse determination.16    Pursuant to the requirements of the Health Carrier 17External Review Act, the covered person or the covered 18person's authorized representative may request an expedited 19external review. An expedited external review may not occur if 20the substance use disorder treatment provider or facility 21determines that continued treatment is no longer medically 22necessary. 23    If an expedited external review request meets the criteria 24of the Health Carrier External Review Act, an independent 25review organization shall make a final determination of 26medical necessity within 72 hours. If an independent review   HB3020- 16 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1organization upholds an adverse determination, an insurer 2shall remain responsible to provide coverage of benefits 3through the day following the determination of the independent 4review organization. A decision to reverse an adverse 5determination shall comply with the Health Carrier External 6Review Act.7    (5) The substance use disorder treatment provider or 8facility shall provide the insurer with 7 business days' 9advance notice of the planned discharge of the patient from 10the substance use disorder treatment provider or facility and 11notice on the day that the patient is discharged from the 12substance use disorder treatment provider or facility.13    (6) The benefits required by this subsection shall be 14provided to all covered persons with a diagnosis of substance 15use disorder or conditions. The presence of additional related 16or unrelated diagnoses shall not be a basis to reduce or deny 17the benefits required by this subsection.18    (7) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 19require an insurer to provide coverage for any of the benefits 20in this subsection.21    (h) As used in this Section:22    "Generally accepted standards of mental, emotional, 23nervous, or substance use disorder or condition care" means 24standards of care and clinical practice that are generally 25recognized by health care providers practicing in relevant 26clinical specialties such as psychiatry, psychology, clinical   HB3020- 17 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1sociology, social work, addiction medicine and counseling, and 2behavioral health treatment. Valid, evidence-based sources 3reflecting generally accepted standards of mental, emotional, 4nervous, or substance use disorder or condition care include 5peer-reviewed scientific studies and medical literature, 6recommendations of nonprofit health care provider professional 7associations and specialty societies, including, but not 8limited to, patient placement criteria and clinical practice 9guidelines, recommendations of federal government agencies, 10and drug labeling approved by the United States Food and Drug 11Administration.12    "Medically necessary treatment of mental, emotional, 13nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions" means a 14service or product addressing the specific needs of that 15patient, for the purpose of screening, preventing, diagnosing, 16managing, or treating an illness, injury, or condition or its 17symptoms and comorbidities, including minimizing the 18progression of an illness, injury, or condition or its 19symptoms and comorbidities in a manner that is all of the 20following:21        (1) in accordance with the generally accepted 22    standards of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 23    disorder or condition care;24        (2) clinically appropriate in terms of type, 25    frequency, extent, site, and duration; and26        (3) not primarily for the economic benefit of the   HB3020- 18 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1    insurer, purchaser, or for the convenience of the patient, 2    treating physician, or other health care provider.3    "Utilization review" means either of the following:4        (1) prospectively, retrospectively, or concurrently 5    reviewing and approving, modifying, delaying, or denying, 6    based in whole or in part on medical necessity, requests 7    by health care providers, insureds, or their authorized 8    representatives for coverage of health care services 9    before, retrospectively, or concurrently with the 10    provision of health care services to insureds.11        (2) evaluating the medical necessity, appropriateness, 12    level of care, service intensity, efficacy, or efficiency 13    of health care services, benefits, procedures, or 14    settings, under any circumstances, to determine whether a 15    health care service or benefit subject to a medical 16    necessity coverage requirement in an insurance policy is 17    covered as medically necessary for an insured.18    "Utilization review criteria" means patient placement 19criteria or any criteria, standards, protocols, or guidelines 20used by an insurer to conduct utilization review.21    (i)(1) Every insurer that amends, delivers, issues, or 22renews a group or individual policy of accident and health 23insurance or a qualified health plan offered through the 24health insurance marketplace in this State and Medicaid 25managed care organizations providing coverage for hospital or 26medical treatment on or after January 1, 2023 shall, pursuant   HB3020- 19 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1to subsections (h) through (s), provide coverage for medically 2necessary treatment of mental, emotional, nervous, or 3substance use disorders or conditions.4    (2) An insurer shall not set a specific limit on the 5duration of benefits or coverage of medically necessary 6treatment of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 7disorders or conditions or limit coverage only to alleviation 8of the insured's current symptoms.9    (3) All utilization review conducted by the insurer 10concerning diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of insureds 11diagnosed with mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 12disorders or conditions shall be conducted in accordance with 13the requirements of subsections (k) through (w).14    (4) An insurer that authorizes a specific type of 15treatment by a provider pursuant to this Section shall not 16rescind or modify the authorization after that provider 17renders the health care service in good faith and pursuant to 18this authorization for any reason, including, but not limited 19to, the insurer's subsequent cancellation or modification of 20the insured's or policyholder's contract, or the insured's or 21policyholder's eligibility. Nothing in this Section shall 22require the insurer to cover a treatment when the 23authorization was granted based on a material 24misrepresentation by the insured, the policyholder, or the 25provider. Nothing in this Section shall require Medicaid 26managed care organizations to pay for services if the   HB3020- 20 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1individual was not eligible for Medicaid at the time the 2service was rendered. Nothing in this Section shall require an 3insurer to pay for services if the individual was not the 4insurer's enrollee at the time services were rendered. As used 5in this paragraph, "material" means a fact or situation that 6is not merely technical in nature and results in or could 7result in a substantial change in the situation.8    (j) An insurer shall not limit benefits or coverage for 9medically necessary services on the basis that those services 10should be or could be covered by a public entitlement program, 11including, but not limited to, special education or an 12individualized education program, Medicaid, Medicare, 13Supplemental Security Income, or Social Security Disability 14Insurance, and shall not include or enforce a contract term 15that excludes otherwise covered benefits on the basis that 16those services should be or could be covered by a public 17entitlement program. Nothing in this subsection shall be 18construed to require an insurer to cover benefits that have 19been authorized and provided for a covered person by a public 20entitlement program. Medicaid managed care organizations are 21not subject to this subsection.22    (k) An insurer shall base any medical necessity 23determination or the utilization review criteria that the 24insurer, and any entity acting on the insurer's behalf, 25applies to determine the medical necessity of health care 26services and benefits for the diagnosis, prevention, and   HB3020- 21 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1treatment of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 2disorders or conditions on current generally accepted 3standards of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 4disorder or condition care. All denials and appeals shall be 5reviewed by a professional with experience or expertise 6comparable to the provider requesting the authorization.7    (l) In conducting utilization review of all covered health 8care services for the diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of 9mental, emotional, and nervous disorders or conditions, an 10insurer shall apply the criteria and guidelines set forth in 11the most recent version of the treatment criteria developed by 12an unaffiliated nonprofit professional association for the 13relevant clinical specialty or, for Medicaid managed care 14organizations, criteria and guidelines determined by the 15Department of Healthcare and Family Services that are 16consistent with generally accepted standards of mental, 17emotional, nervous or substance use disorder or condition 18care. Pursuant to subsection (b), in conducting utilization 19review of all covered services and benefits for the diagnosis, 20prevention, and treatment of substance use disorders an 21insurer shall use the most recent edition of the patient 22placement criteria established by the American Society of 23Addiction Medicine.24    (m) In conducting utilization review relating to level of 25care placement, continued stay, transfer, discharge, or any 26other patient care decisions that are within the scope of the   HB3020- 22 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1sources specified in subsection (l), an insurer shall not 2apply different, additional, conflicting, or more restrictive 3utilization review criteria than the criteria set forth in 4those sources. For all level of care placement decisions, the 5insurer shall authorize placement at the level of care 6consistent with the assessment of the insured using the 7relevant patient placement criteria as specified in subsection 8(l). If that level of placement is not available, the insurer 9shall authorize the next higher level of care. In the event of 10disagreement, the insurer shall provide full detail of its 11assessment using the relevant criteria as specified in 12subsection (l) to the provider of the service and the patient.13    If an insurer purchases or licenses utilization review 14criteria pursuant to this subsection, the insurer shall verify 15and document before use that the criteria were developed in 16accordance with subsection (k). 17    (n) In conducting utilization review that is outside the 18scope of the criteria as specified in subsection (l) or 19relates to the advancements in technology or in the types or 20levels of care that are not addressed in the most recent 21versions of the sources specified in subsection (l), an 22insurer shall conduct utilization review in accordance with 23subsection (k).24    (o) This Section does not in any way limit the rights of a 25patient under the Medical Patient Rights Act.26    (p) This Section does not in any way limit early and   HB3020- 23 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment benefits as 2defined under 42 U.S.C. 1396d(r).3    (q) To ensure the proper use of the criteria described in 4subsection (l), every insurer shall do all of the following:5        (1) Educate the insurer's staff, including any third 6    parties contracted with the insurer to review claims, 7    conduct utilization reviews, or make medical necessity 8    determinations about the utilization review criteria.9        (2) Make the educational program available to other 10    stakeholders, including the insurer's participating or 11    contracted providers and potential participants, 12    beneficiaries, or covered lives. The education program 13    must be provided at least once a year, in-person or 14    digitally, or recordings of the education program must be 15    made available to the aforementioned stakeholders.16        (3) Provide, at no cost, the utilization review 17    criteria and any training material or resources to 18    providers and insured patients upon request. For 19    utilization review criteria not concerning level of care 20    placement, continued stay, transfer, discharge, or other 21    patient care decisions used by the insurer pursuant to 22    subsection (m), the insurer may place the criteria on a 23    secure, password-protected website so long as the access 24    requirements of the website do not unreasonably restrict 25    access to insureds or their providers. No restrictions 26    shall be placed upon the insured's or treating provider's   HB3020- 24 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1    access right to utilization review criteria obtained under 2    this paragraph at any point in time, including before an 3    initial request for authorization.4        (4) Track, identify, and analyze how the utilization 5    review criteria are used to certify care, deny care, and 6    support the appeals process.7        (5) Conduct interrater reliability testing to ensure 8    consistency in utilization review decision making that 9    covers how medical necessity decisions are made; this 10    assessment shall cover all aspects of utilization review 11    as defined in subsection (h).12        (6) Run interrater reliability reports about how the 13    clinical guidelines are used in conjunction with the 14    utilization review process and parity compliance 15    activities.16        (7) Achieve interrater reliability pass rates of at 17    least 90% and, if this threshold is not met, immediately 18    provide for the remediation of poor interrater reliability 19    and interrater reliability testing for all new staff 20    before they can conduct utilization review without 21    supervision.22        (8) Maintain documentation of interrater reliability 23    testing and the remediation actions taken for those with 24    pass rates lower than 90% and submit to the Department of 25    Insurance or, in the case of Medicaid managed care 26    organizations, the Department of Healthcare and Family   HB3020- 25 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1    Services the testing results and a summary of remedial 2    actions as part of parity compliance reporting set forth 3    in subsection (k) of Section 370c.1.4    (r) This Section applies to all health care services and 5benefits for the diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of 6mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 7conditions covered by an insurance policy, including 8prescription drugs.9    (s) This Section applies to an insurer that amends, 10delivers, issues, or renews a group or individual policy of 11accident and health insurance or a qualified health plan 12offered through the health insurance marketplace in this State 13providing coverage for hospital or medical treatment and 14conducts utilization review as defined in this Section, 15including Medicaid managed care organizations, and any entity 16or contracting provider that performs utilization review or 17utilization management functions on an insurer's behalf.18    (t) If the Director determines that an insurer has 19violated this Section, the Director may, after appropriate 20notice and opportunity for hearing, by order, assess a civil 21penalty between $1,000 and $5,000 for each violation. Moneys 22collected from penalties shall be deposited into the Parity 23Advancement Fund established in subsection (i) of Section 24370c.1.25    (u) An insurer shall not adopt, impose, or enforce terms 26in its policies or provider agreements, in writing or in   HB3020- 26 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1operation, that undermine, alter, or conflict with the 2requirements of this Section.3    (v) The provisions of this Section are severable. If any 4provision of this Section or its application is held invalid, 5that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or 6applications that can be given effect without the invalid 7provision or application. 8    (w) Beginning January 1, 2026, coverage for inpatient 9mental health treatment at participating hospitals shall 10comply with the following requirements:11        (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this 12    subsection, no policy shall require prior authorization 13    for admission for such treatment at any participating 14    hospital.15        (2) Coverage provided under this subsection also shall 16    not be subject to concurrent review for the first 72 17    hours, provided that the hospital must notify the insurer 18    of both the admission and the initial treatment plan 19    within 48 hours of admission. A discharge plan must be 20    fully developed and continuity services prepared to meet 21    the patient's needs and the patient's community preference 22    upon release. Nothing in this paragraph supersedes a 23    health maintenance organization's referral requirement for 24    services from nonparticipating providers upon a patient's 25    discharge from a hospital.26        (3) Treatment provided under this subsection may be   HB3020- 27 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1    reviewed retrospectively. If coverage is denied 2    retrospectively, neither the insurer nor the participating 3    hospital shall bill, and the insured shall not be liable, 4    for any treatment under this subsection through the date 5    the adverse determination is issued, other than any 6    copayment, coinsurance, or deductible for the stay through 7    that date as applicable under the policy. Coverage shall 8    not be retrospectively denied for the first 72 hours of 9    treatment at a participating hospital except:10            (A) upon reasonable determination that the 11        inpatient mental health treatment was not provided;12            (B) upon determination that the patient receiving 13        the treatment was not an insured, enrollee, or 14        beneficiary under the policy; 15            (C) upon material misrepresentation by the patient 16        or health care provider. In this item (C), "material" 17        means a fact or situation that is not merely technical 18        in nature and results or could result in a substantial 19        change in the situation; or20            (D) upon determination that a service was excluded 21        under the terms of coverage. In that case, the 22        limitation to billing for a copayment, coinsurance, or 23        deductible shall not apply.24        (4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 25    require a policy to cover any health care service excluded 26    under the terms of coverage.   HB3020- 28 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1    (x) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section, nothing 2shall require the medical assistance program under Article V 3of the Illinois Public Aid Code to violate any applicable 4federal laws, regulations, or grant requirements or any State 5or federal consent decrees. Nothing in subsection (w) shall 6prevent the Department of Healthcare and Family Services from 7requiring a health care provider to use specified level of 8care, admission, continued stay, or discharge criteria, 9including, but not limited to, those under Section 5-5.23 of 10the Illinois Public Aid Code, as long as the Department of 11Healthcare and Family Services does not require a health care 12provider to seek prior authorization or concurrent review from 13the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, a Medicaid 14managed care organization, or a utilization review 15organization under the circumstances expressly prohibited by 16subsection (w). Nothing in this Section prohibits a health 17plan, including a Medicaid managed care organization, from 18conducting reviews for fraud, waste, or abuse and reporting 19suspected fraud, waste, or abuse according to State and 20federal requirements.21    (y) Children's Mental Health. Nothing in this Section 22shall suspend the screening and assessment requirements for 23mental health services for children participating in the 24State's medical assistance program as required in Section 255-5.23 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 26(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-579, eff. 1-1-22;   HB3020- 29 -LRB104 08245 BAB 18295 b1102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-650, eff. 21-1-25; 103-1040, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.)